Utah statutes.
78B-6-601.   Penalty for wrongful refusal to allow writ of habeas corpus.

Any judge, whether acting individually or as a member of a court, who wrongfully and willfully refuses to allow a writ of habeas corpus whenever proper application has been made shall forfeit and pay a sum not exceeding $5,000 to the aggrieved party.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

